vec.aff
FLAG long
# vèrbi '-er inregolari ((bene|d[ei]x|ind|inter|kontra|ma[lƚ]e|pre|re)díxer)
# themeT1 + er/c0c1c2n0n1n2E0E1E2
# themeT4 + rò/c0c1c2n0n1n2J0
SFX n0 Y 64
SFX n0 erò éndome/G0 xerò
SFX n0 erò éndomene/G0 xerò
SFX n0 erò éntome/G0 xerò
SFX n0 erò éntomene/G0 xerò
SFX n0 xer gone/K0 xer	is:interrogative
SFX n0 xerò ga xerò
SFX n0 xerò gando/E0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò gi/F0L0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò go/J0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò gàndome/G0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò gàndomene/G0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò gàntome/G0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò gàntomene/G0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò r/E0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò rave/F0 xerò	ts:conditional_present
SFX n0 xerò re xerò
SFX n0 xerò remo/E0J0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò ren/J0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò rense xerò
SFX n0 xerò rensi xerò
SFX n0 xerò resi/N0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò resiu/O0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò rimo/E0J0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò rion/J0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò rione/K0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò rionse xerò
SFX n0 xerò risen/J0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò risense xerò
SFX n0 xerò risensi xerò
SFX n0 xerò risi/N0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò rision/J0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò risione/K0 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX n0 xerò risionse xerò
SFX n0 xerò risiu/O0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò risié/N0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò risiéu/O0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò rison/J0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò risone/K0 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX n0 xerò risonse xerò
SFX n0 xerò rié/N0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò riéu/O0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò ron/E0J0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò rone/K0 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX n0 xerò ronme/G0G1 xerò
SFX n0 xerò rà/F0J0L0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò ràe/F0 xerò	ts:conditional_present
SFX n0 xerò ràvene/K0 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX n0 xerò rè/J0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò rène/K0 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX n0 xerò ré/N0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò résimo/J0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò résimoe/K0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò résitu/M0 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX n0 xerò réu/O0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò rí/N0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò ría/F0J0L0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò rèe/F0J0L0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò ríane/K0 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX n0 xerò ríatu/M0 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX n0 xerò ríe/F0J0L0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò ríene/K0 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX n0 xerò rísitu/M0 xerò	is:interrogative
SFX n0 xerò rò/J0 xerò
SFX n0 xerò rónmene/G0 xerò

# vèrbi '-er inregolari ((bene|d[ei]x|ind|inter|kontra|ma[lƚ]e|pre|re)díxer)
# themeT1 + er/c0c1c2n0n1n2E0E1E2
# themeT4 + rò/c0c1c2n0n1n2J0
SFX n1 Y 25
SFX n1 erò éndolo/G1 xerò
SFX n1 erò éndomelo/G1 xerò
SFX n1 erò éntolo/G1 xerò
SFX n1 erò éntomelo/G1 xerò
SFX n1 ixerò ígelo/B0 xerò
SFX n1 xerò ge-lo/B0 xerò
SFX n1 xerò gando/E1 xerò
SFX n1 xerò gàndolo/G1 xerò
SFX n1 xerò gàndomelo/G1 xerò
SFX n1 xerò gàntolo/G1 xerò
SFX n1 xerò gàntomelo/G1 xerò
SFX n1 xerò r/E1 xerò
SFX n1 xerò ralo/B0 xerò
SFX n1 xerò rave-lo/B0 xerò
SFX n1 xerò rà-lo/B0 xerò
SFX n1 xerò ràe-lo/B0 xerò
SFX n1 xerò ràelo/B0 xerò
SFX n1 xerò ràvelo/B0 xerò
SFX n1 xerò remo/E1 xerò
SFX n1 xerò rimo/E1 xerò
SFX n1 xerò ríe-lo/B0 xerò
SFX n1 xerò ríelo/B0 xerò
SFX n1 xerò ríselo/Q1 xerò
SFX n1 xerò ron/E1 xerò
SFX n1 xerò rónmelo/G1 xerò

# vèrbi '-er inregolari ((bene|d[ei]x|ind|inter|kontra|ma[lƚ]e|pre|re)díxer)
# themeT1 + er/c0c1c2n0n1n2E0E1E2
# themeT4 + rò/c0c1c2n0n1n2J0
SFX n2 Y 25
SFX n2 erò éndomeƚo/G2 xerò
SFX n2 erò éndoƚo/G2 xerò
SFX n2 erò éntomeƚo/G2 xerò
SFX n2 erò éntoƚo/G2 xerò
SFX n2 ixerò ígeƚo/B0 xerò
SFX n2 xerò ge-ƚo/B0 xerò
SFX n2 xerò gàndomeƚo/G2 xerò
SFX n2 xerò gando/E2 xerò
SFX n2 xerò gàndoƚo/G2 xerò
SFX n2 xerò gàntomeƚo/G2 xerò
SFX n2 xerò gàntoƚo/G2 xerò
SFX n2 xerò r/E2 xerò
SFX n2 xerò rave-ƚo/B0 xerò
SFX n2 xerò raƚo/B0 xerò
SFX n2 xerò rà-ƚo/B0 xerò
SFX n2 xerò ràe-ƚo/B0 xerò
SFX n2 xerò ràeƚo/B0 xerò
SFX n2 xerò ràveƚo/B0 xerò
SFX n2 xerò remo/E2 xerò
SFX n2 xerò rimo/E2 xerò
SFX n2 xerò ríe-ƚo/B0 xerò
SFX n2 xerò ríeƚo/B0 xerò
SFX n2 xerò ríseƚo/Q2 xerò
SFX n2 xerò ron/E2 xerò
SFX n2 xerò rónmeƚo/G2 xerò
